viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX b0 Y 191
SFX b0 er er/ er  is:infi
SFX b0 er ant/ [^c]er  is:ppre
SFX b0 cer çant/ cer  is:ppre
SFX b0 ecer èce/ ecer  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 emer ème/ emer  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 ener ène/ ener  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 eper èpe/ eper  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 erer ère/ erer  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 eser èse/ eser  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 ever ève/ ever  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvre/ evrer  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 eter ète/ eter  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 eler èle/ eler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX b0 er è/ er  is:ipre is:1isg
SFX b0 ecer èces/ ecer  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmes/ emer  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 ener ènes/ ener  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 eper èpes/ eper  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 erer ères/ erer  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 eser èses/ eser  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 ever èves/ ever  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvres/ evrer  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 eter ètes/ eter  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 eler èles/ eler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX b0 er ons/ [^c]er  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX b0 cer çons/ cer  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX b0 er ez/ er  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX b0 ecer ècent/ ecer  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 emer èment/ emer  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 ener ènent/ ener  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 eper èpent/ eper  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 erer èrent/ erer  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 eser èsent/ eser  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 ever èvent/ ever  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrent/ evrer  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 eter ètent/ eter  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 eler èlent/ eler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX b0 er ais/ [^c]er  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 cer çais/ cer  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 er ait/ [^c]er  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX b0 cer çait/ cer  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX b0 er ions/ er  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX b0 er iez/ er  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX b0 er aient/ [^c]er  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX b0 cer çaient/ cer  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX b0 er ai/ [^c]er  is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX b0 cer çai/ cer  is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX b0 er as/ [^c]er  is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX b0 cer ças/ cer  is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX b0 er a/ [^c]er  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX b0 cer ça/ cer  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX b0 er âmes/ [^c]er  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX b0 cer çâmes/ cer  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX b0 er âtes/ [^c]er  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX b0 cer çâtes/ cer  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX b0 er èrent/ er  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX b0 ecer ècerai/ ecer  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 emer èmerai/ emer  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 ener ènerai/ ener  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 eper èperai/ eper  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 erer èrerai/ erer  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 eser èserai/ eser  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 ever èverai/ ever  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerai/ evrer  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 eter èterai/ eter  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 eler èlerai/ eler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX b0 ecer èceras/ ecer  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmeras/ emer  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 ener èneras/ ener  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 eper èperas/ eper  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 erer èreras/ erer  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 eser èseras/ eser  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 ever èveras/ ever  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvreras/ evrer  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 eter èteras/ eter  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 eler èleras/ eler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX b0 ecer ècera/ ecer  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 emer èmera/ emer  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 ener ènera/ ener  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 eper èpera/ eper  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 erer èrera/ erer  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 eser èsera/ eser  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 ever èvera/ ever  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrera/ evrer  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 eter ètera/ eter  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 eler èlera/ eler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerons/ ecer  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 emer èmerons/ emer  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 ener ènerons/ ener  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 eper èperons/ eper  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 erer èrerons/ erer  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 eser èserons/ eser  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 ever èverons/ ever  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerons/ evrer  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 eter èterons/ eter  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 eler èlerons/ eler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX b0 ecer ècerez/ ecer  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 emer èmerez/ emer  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 ener ènerez/ ener  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 eper èperez/ eper  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 erer èrerez/ erer  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 eser èserez/ eser  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 ever èverez/ ever  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerez/ evrer  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 eter èterez/ eter  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 eler èlerez/ eler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX b0 ecer èceront/ ecer  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 emer èmeront/ emer  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 ener èneront/ ener  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 eper èperont/ eper  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 erer èreront/ erer  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 eser èseront/ eser  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 ever èveront/ ever  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 evrer èvreront/ evrer  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 eter èteront/ eter  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 eler èleront/ eler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX b0 ecer ècerais/ ecer  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmerais/ emer  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 ener ènerais/ ener  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 eper èperais/ eper  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 erer èrerais/ erer  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 eser èserais/ eser  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 ever èverais/ ever  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerais/ evrer  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 eter èterais/ eter  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 eler èlerais/ eler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerait/ ecer  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 emer èmerait/ emer  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 ener ènerait/ ener  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 eper èperait/ eper  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 erer èrerait/ erer  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 eser èserait/ eser  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 ever èverait/ ever  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerait/ evrer  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 eter èterait/ eter  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 eler èlerait/ eler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerions/ ecer  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 emer èmerions/ emer  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 ener ènerions/ ener  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 eper èperions/ eper  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 erer èrerions/ erer  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 eser èserions/ eser  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 ever èverions/ ever  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerions/ evrer  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 eter èterions/ eter  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 eler èlerions/ eler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX b0 ecer èceriez/ ecer  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 emer èmeriez/ emer  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 ener èneriez/ ener  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 eper èperiez/ eper  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 erer èreriez/ erer  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 eser èseriez/ eser  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 ever èveriez/ ever  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 evrer èvreriez/ evrer  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 eter èteriez/ eter  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 eler èleriez/ eler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX b0 ecer èceraient/ ecer  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 emer èmeraient/ emer  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 ener èneraient/ ener  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 eper èperaient/ eper  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 erer èreraient/ erer  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 eser èseraient/ eser  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 ever èveraient/ ever  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 evrer èvreraient/ evrer  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 eter èteraient/ eter  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 eler èleraient/ eler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX b0 er asse/ [^c]er  is:simp is:1sg
SFX b0 cer çasse/ cer  is:simp is:1sg
SFX b0 er asses/ [^c]er  is:simp is:2sg
SFX b0 cer çasses/ cer  is:simp is:2sg
SFX b0 er ât/ [^c]er  is:simp is:3sg
SFX b0 cer çât/ cer  is:simp is:3sg
SFX b0 er assions/ [^c]er  is:simp is:1pl
SFX b0 cer çassions/ cer  is:simp is:1pl
SFX b0 er assiez/ [^c]er  is:simp is:2pl
SFX b0 cer çassiez/ cer  is:simp is:2pl
SFX b0 er assent/ [^c]er  is:simp is:3pl
SFX b0 cer çassent/ cer  is:simp is:3pl
SFX b0 ecer èce/ ecer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 emer ème/ emer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 ener ène/ ener  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 eper èpe/ eper  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 erer ère/ erer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 eser èse/ eser  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 ever ève/ ever  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvre/ evrer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX b0 eter ète/ eter  is:impe is:2sg
